Utah statutes.
75-2-401.   Exempt property and allowances -- Applicable law.

This part applies to the estate of a decedent who dies domiciled in Utah.  Rights to homestead allowance, exempt property, and family allowance for a decedent who dies not domiciled in Utah are governed by the law of the decedent's domicile at death.

